Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.115

Guaranty fund—Payment of interest and dividends—Legislative declaration.

It is hereby recognized that the savings banks of the state of Washington are affected adversely by the uncertainties and ambiguities in the law relating to guaranty funds. It is the express purpose of the legislature in enacting RCW 32.08.116 to clarify that the law permits payment of interest and dividends from the guaranty funds of savings banks and RCW 32.08.116 shall be liberally construed to that end.

[ 1982 c 5 s 1.]